Utah statutes.
58-53-102.   Definitions.
In addition to the definitions in Section 58-1-102, as used in this chapter:
(1)  "Board" means the Landscape Architects Board created in Section
58-53-201.
(2)  "Fund" means the Landscape Architects Education and Enforcement Fund
created in Section 58-53-103.
(3)  "Practice of landscape architecture" means rendering or offering to
render any of the following services:
(a)  production of a site plan which may include the design of any of the
following:
(i)  sprinkler irrigation systems;
(ii)  landscape grading and drainage plans; or
(iii)  parking lots;
(b)  design of any of the following structures incidental to the production of
a site plan:
(i)  retaining walls; or
(ii)  raised platforms, decks, and walkways;
(c)  design of any of the following structures incidental to the production of
a site plan when the structure does not exceed 1,000 square feet:
(i)  covered pavilions;
(ii)  gazebos;
(iii)  restrooms;
(iv)  storage and maintenance facilities; or
(v)  other accessory structures; or
(d)  collaboration with architects and professional engineers in the design of
roads, bridges, buildings, and structures with respect to the functional and
aesthetic requirements of the area in which they are to be placed.
(4)  "Principal" means a licensed landscape architect having responsible
charge of a landscape architectural practice.
(5)  "Supervision" with respect to the supervision of an employee of a
landscape architect, means that a licensed landscape architect is responsible
for and personally reviews, corrects when necessary, and approves work
performed by any employee under the direction of the landscape architect, and
may be further defined by rule of the division in collaboration with the
board.
(6)  "Unlawful conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-501 and 58-53-501.
(7)  "Unprofessional conduct" is as defined in Section 58-1-501 and as may be
further defined by rule of the division in collaboration with the board.
